lexica/adverbs_overrides.lexc
! We use the Root lexicon here instead of Adverb because Adverb allows the
! prepending of 'naj' to make a superlative, which leads to over-generation
! with these forms.
LEXICON Root

bolj+Adverb+General+Comparative:bolj #;
manj+Adverb+General+Comparative:manj #;
najbolj+Adverb+General+Superlative:najbolj #;
najmanj+Adverb+General+Superlative:najmanj #;
najprej+Adverb+General+Superlative:najprej #;
najraje+Adverb+General+Superlative:najraje #;
najraje+Adverb+General+Superlative:najrajši #;
največ+Adverb+General+Superlative:največ #;
največkrat+Adverb+General+Superlative:največkrat #;
prej+Adverb+General+Comparative:prej #;
raje+Adverb+General+Comparative:raje #;
raje+Adverb+General+Comparative:rajši #;
več+Adverb+General+Comparative:več #;
večkrat+Adverb+General+Comparative:večkrat #;
